Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.524

Seattle Sounders FC license plates.

"Seattle Sounders FC license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork recognizing Seattle Sounders FC.

[ 2013 c 286 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 286: See note following RCW 46.18.200.